Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Miscellaneous Offenses

§ 35-10-401.
Obstructing or injuring highways, streets, bridges or navigable streams generally; offensive manufactures or businesses; pollution of waters.

If any person, company or corporation shall obstruct or injure or cause or procure to be obstructed or injured, any public road or highway, or common street or alley of any town or village, or any public bridge or causeway, or public river or stream, declared navigable by law, or shall continue such obstruction, so as to render the same inconvenient or dangerous to pass, or shall erect or establish any offensive trade, or manufacture or business, or continue the same after it has been erected or established, or shall in anywise pollute or obstruct any watercourse, lake, pond, marsh or common sewer, or continue such obstruction or pollution, so as to render the same unwholesome or offensive to the county, city, town or neighborhood thereabouts; every person, company or corporation so offending, shall upon conviction thereof, be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00); and every such nuisance may, by order of the district court before whom the conviction may take place, be removed and abated by the sheriff of the proper county.

Whoever, in any manner, wrongfully obstructs any public highway, or injures any bridge, culvert, or embankment, or injures any material used in the construction of any such road, shall be fined in any sum not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), to which may be added imprisonment in the county jail not more than three (3) months.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 35, § 120; Laws 1886, ch. 73, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1003; Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 67; R.S. 1899, §§ 5020, 5107; C.S. 1910, §§ 5864, 5958; C.S. 1920, §§ 7153, 7247; R.S. 1931, §§ 32-361, 32-702; C.S. 1945, §§ 9-711, 9-712; W.S. 1957, § 35-479.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Environmental Quality Act, see chapter 11 to this title.

As to nuisances generally, see §§

6-6-201

to

6-6-209

.

For provisions relating to highways generally, see §§

24-1-101

to

24-1-133

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Operation of cement plant as nuisance, 82 ALR3d 1004.

Res ipsa loquitur as applicable in actions for damage to property by the overflow or escape of water, 91 ALR3d 186.

Car wash as nuisance, 4 ALR4th 1308.

Standing to sue for violation of state environmental regulatory statute, 66 ALR4th 685.

Liability of railroad or other private landowner for vegetation obscuring view at railroad crossing, 66 ALR4th 885.

State and local government liability for injury or death of bicyclist due to defect or obstruction in public bicycle path, 68 ALR4th 204.

Liability of private landowner for vegetation obscuring view at highway or street intersection, 69 ALR4th 1092.

§ 35-10-402.
Entering mines, metallurgical works or sawmills while intoxicated; taking intoxicants into related structures.

Whoever shall, while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, enter any mine, smelter, metallurgical works, machine shops or sawmills, or any of the buildings connected with the operation of the same in Wyoming where miners or workmen are employed or whoever shall carry or haul any intoxicating liquor into the same or any logging or grading camp shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined in any sum not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00) to which may be added imprisonment in the county jail for a term not exceeding one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 58, § 1; 1909, ch. 32, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 5890; C.S. 1920, § 7179; R.S. 1931, § 32-378; C.S. 1945, § 9-713; W.S. 1957, § 35-480.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Employer's liability for furnishing or permitting liquor on social occasion, 51 ALR4th 1048.

§ 35-10-403.
Boats for hire required to have life preservers.

Any person who shall keep for hire boats, not equipped with life preservers for the protection of every occupant, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 135, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 9-714; W.S. 1957, § 35-481.

§ 35-10-404.
Life jackets for occupants of boats and rafts required.

Each and every person who shall operate a boat, raft or other navigable vessel shall have available for each occupant on said boat a life jacket of the coast guard approved type during the time the boat, raft or vessel is afloat upon any of the waters of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 92, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-482.

§ 35-10-405.
Life jackets for occupants of boats and rafts; penalty.

Any person violating the provisions of the act [§§

35-10-404

through

35-10-406

] shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 92, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-483.

§ 35-10-406.
Life jackets for occupants of boats and rafts; enforcement.

Each and every city, town, county and state law enforcement officer and the game wardens of the Wyoming game and fish commission shall enforce the provisions of this act [§§

35-10-404

through

35-10-406

].

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 92, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-484.

§ 35-10-407.
Abandoned iceboxes or refrigerators.

Whoever abandons or stores any refrigeration unit or icebox in such a place as to be easily accessible to children without first having made adequate provision to prevent entry into such refrigeration unit or icebox or without having removed all latches, catches, locking devices or the door thereof, so that escape from the interior may be had, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor; and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in a sum of not less than fifteen dollars ($15.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or be imprisoned for not more than ninety (90) days or both.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 12, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-485.

§ 35-10-408.
Additional authority of counties, cities and towns to regulate nuisances.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as to prevent any city, town or village, incorporated under the laws of this state, or the proper corporate authority thereof, from passing or enforcing any ordinance, bylaw, regulation or rule, regulating, restraining, or prohibiting nuisances of any kind or character, or from enforcing any ordinance, bylaw, rule or regulation thereupon, already passed and in force.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as to prevent any county from passing or enforcing any resolution regulating, restraining, or prohibiting nuisances which the commission determines to be a threat to health or safety pursuant to W.S. 18-2-101(a)(viii), or from enforcing any resolution already passed and in force.

History.

Laws 1884, ch. 62, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1024; R.S. 1899, § 5117; C.S. 1910, § 5968; C.S. 1920, § 7257; R.S. 1931, § 32-712; C.S. 1945, § 9-708; W.S. 1957, § 35-486; 2008, ch. 81, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, designated the existing provisions as (a) and substituted “shall be construed” for “contained shall be so construed” therein; and added (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” refer to ch. 62, Laws 1884.

Authority of municipality to regulate. —

Municipalities have authority to decide what constitutes nuisances, and to abate and punish under ordinances prescribing such nuisances. Town of Green River v. Fuller Brush Co., 65 F.2d 112, 1933 U.S. App. LEXIS 2934 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1933).

Soliciting at residence. —

Ordinance making it a nuisance to solicit border of occupants of private residence was not an arbitrary exercise of police power and was not unwarranted. Town of Green River v. Fuller Brush Co., 65 F.2d 112, 1933 U.S. App. LEXIS 2934 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1933).

§ 35-10-409.
Sale of metal beverage containers which are severable upon opening prohibited; penalty; definitions.

No person shall sell or offer for sale in this state any metal beverage container so designed and constructed that a nonbiodegradable part of the container is severed when the container is opened, with the following exceptions:

Metal beverage containers designed and constructed with biodegradable severed parts;

Metal beverage containers sealed by pressure sensitive adhesive strips; and

The manufacture of metal beverage containers with or without severable parts in this state for sale outside of Wyoming.

Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

As used in this section, “beverage” means mineral waters, soda water, carbonated or noncarbonated soft drinks or alcoholic or malt beverages as defined in W.S. 12-1-101(a)(vii) and (x).

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 186, § 1; 1986, ch. 23, § 1.